Utah statutes.
10-3b-501.   Authority to change to another form of municipal government.
As provided in this part, a municipality may change from the form of
government under which it operates to:
(1)  the council-mayor form of government with a five-member council;
(2)  the council-mayor form of government with a seven-member council;
(3)  the six-member council form of government; or
(4)  the five-member council form of government.
